Illinois, session 104th, SB2718.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. References to Act. This Act may be referred to 5as the Save Our Power Plants Act. 6    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 7changing Section 9.15 as follows: 8    (415 ILCS 5/9.15)9    Sec. 9.15. Greenhouse gases.10    (a) An air pollution construction permit shall not be 11required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 12equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 13defined by 40 CFR 52.21, as now or hereafter amended, for 14greenhouse gases or is otherwise not addressed in this Section 15or by the Board in regulations for greenhouse gases. These 16exemptions do not relieve an owner or operator from the 17obligation to comply with other applicable rules or 18regulations.19    (b) An air pollution operating permit shall not be 20required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 21equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 22defined by Section 39.5 of this Act, for greenhouse gases or is   SB2718- 2 -LRB104 15725 AAS 28908 b1otherwise not addressed in this Section or by the Board in 2regulations for greenhouse gases. These exemptions do not 3relieve an owner or operator from the obligation to comply 4with other applicable rules or regulations.5    (c) (Blank). 6    (d) (Blank).7    (e) (Blank). 8    (f) As used in this Section:9    "Carbon dioxide emission" means the plant annual CO2 total 10output emission as measured by the United States Environmental 11Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 12Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor. 13    "Carbon dioxide equivalent emissions" or "CO2e" means the 14sum total of the mass amount of emissions in tons per year, 15calculated by multiplying the mass amount of each of the 6 16greenhouse gases specified in Section 3.207, in tons per year, 17by its associated global warming potential as set forth in 40 18CFR 98, subpart A, table A-1 or its successor, and then adding 19them all together.20    "Cogeneration" or "combined heat and power" refers to any 21system that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produces 22electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel 23source.24    "Copollutants" refers to the 6 criteria pollutants that 25have been identified by the United States Environmental 26Protection Agency pursuant to the Clean Air Act.  SB2718- 3 -LRB104 15725 AAS 28908 b1    "Electric generating unit" or "EGU" means a fossil 2fuel-fired stationary boiler, combustion turbine, or combined 3cycle system that serves a generator that has a nameplate 4capacity greater than 25 MWe and produces electricity for 5sale.6    "Environmental justice community" means the definition of 7that term based on existing methodologies and findings, used 8and as may be updated by the Illinois Power Agency and its 9program administrator in the Illinois Solar for All Program.10    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 11community" means the geographic areas throughout Illinois that 12would most benefit from equitable investments by the State 13designed to combat discrimination and foster sustainable 14economic growth. Specifically, eligible community means the 15following areas:16        (1) areas where residents have been historically 17    excluded from economic opportunities, including 18    opportunities in the energy sector, as defined as R3 areas 19    pursuant to Section 10-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and 20    Tax Act; and21        (2) areas where residents have been historically 22    subject to disproportionate burdens of pollution, 23    including pollution from the energy sector, as established 24    by environmental justice communities as defined by the 25    Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 26    Agency Act, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators.  SB2718- 4 -LRB104 15725 AAS 28908 b1    "Equity investment eligible person" or "eligible person" 2means the persons who would most benefit from equitable 3investments by the State designed to combat discrimination and 4foster sustainable economic growth. Specifically, eligible 5person means the following people:6        (1) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 7    investment eligible community;8        (2) persons whose primary residence is in a 9    municipality, or a county with a population under 100,000, 10    where the closure of an electric generating unit or mine 11    has been publicly announced or the electric generating 12    unit or mine is in the process of closing or closed within 13    the last 5 years;14        (3) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled 15    in the foster care system; or16        (4) persons who were formerly incarcerated.17    "Existing emissions" means: 18        (1) for CO2e, the total average tons-per-year of CO2e 19    emitted by the EGU or large GHG-emitting unit either in 20    the years 2018 through 2020 or, if the unit was not yet in 21    operation by January 1, 2018, in the first 3 full years of 22    that unit's operation; and23        (2) for any copollutant, the total average 24    tons-per-year of that copollutant emitted by the EGU or 25    large GHG-emitting unit either in the years 2018 through 26    2020 or, if the unit was not yet in operation by January 1,   SB2718- 5 -LRB104 15725 AAS 28908 b1    2018, in the first 3 full years of that unit's operation. 2    "Green hydrogen" means a power plant technology in which 3an EGU creates electric power exclusively from electrolytic 4hydrogen, in a manner that produces zero carbon and 5copollutant emissions, using hydrogen fuel that is 6electrolyzed using a 100% renewable zero carbon emission 7energy source.8    "Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit" or "large 9GHG-emitting unit" means a unit that is an electric generating 10unit or other fossil fuel-fired unit that itself has a 11nameplate capacity or serves a generator that has a nameplate 12capacity greater than 25 MWe and that produces electricity, 13including, but not limited to, coal-fired, coal-derived, 14oil-fired, natural gas-fired, and cogeneration units.15    "NOx emission rate" means the plant annual NOx total output 16emission rate as measured by the United States Environmental 17Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 18Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the most 19recent year for which data is available.20    "Public greenhouse gas-emitting units" or "public 21GHG-emitting unit" means large greenhouse gas-emitting units, 22including EGUs, that are wholly owned, directly or indirectly, 23by one or more municipalities, municipal corporations, joint 24municipal electric power agencies, electric cooperatives, or 25other governmental or nonprofit entities, whether organized 26and created under the laws of Illinois or another state.  SB2718- 6 -LRB104 15725 AAS 28908 b1    "SO2 emission rate" means the "plant annual SO2 total 2output emission rate" as measured by the United States 3Environmental Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation 4Resource Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the 5most recent year for which data is available.6    (g) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 7use coal or oil as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units 8shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 9zero no later than January 1, 2045 2030.10    (h) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 11use coal as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 12permanently reduce CO2e emissions to zero no later than 13December 31, 2060 2045. Any source or plant with such units 14must also reduce their CO2e emissions by 45% from existing 15emissions by no later than January 1, 2035. If the emissions 16reduction requirement is not achieved by December 31, 2050 172035, the plant shall retire one or more units or otherwise 18reduce its CO2e emissions by 45% from existing emissions by 19June 30, 2053 2038.20    (i) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 21use gas as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units shall 22permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 23including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 24hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 25proven to achieve zero carbon emissions, according to the 26following:  SB2718- 7 -LRB104 15725 AAS 28908 b1        (1) No later than January 1, 2045 2030: all EGUs and 2    large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx 3    emissions rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 4    emission rate of greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are 5    located in or within 3 miles of an environmental justice 6    community designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity 7    investment eligible community.8        (2) No later than January 1, 2055 2040: all EGUs and 9    large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx 10    emission rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 11    emission rate greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are not 12    located in or within 3 miles of an environmental justice 13    community designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity 14    investment eligible community. After January 1, 2050 2035, 15    each such EGU and large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall 16    reduce its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing 17    emissions for CO2e, and shall be limited in operation to, 18    on average, 6 hours or less per day, measured over a 19    calendar year, and shall not run for more than 24 20    consecutive hours except in emergency conditions, as 21    designated by a Regional Transmission Organization or 22    Independent System Operator.23        (3) No later than January 1, 2050 2035: all EGUs and 24    large greenhouse gas-emitting units that began operation 25    prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 26    102nd General Assembly and have a NOx emission rate of less   SB2718- 8 -LRB104 15725 AAS 28908 b1    than or equal to 0.12 lb/MWh and a SO2 emission rate less 2    than or equal to 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3    3 miles of an environmental justice community designated 4    as of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 5    community. Each such EGU and large greenhouse gas-emitting 6    unit shall reduce its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from 7    its existing emissions for CO2e no later than January 1, 8    2045 2030.9        (4) No later than January 1, 2055 2040: All remaining 10    EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a 11    heat rate greater than or equal to 7000 BTU/kWh. Each such 12    EGU and Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce 13    its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing 14    emissions for CO2e no later than January 1, 2035.15        (5) No later than January 1, 2060 2045: all remaining 16    EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units. 17    (j) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 18use gas as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 19permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 20including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 21hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 22proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by January 1, 2060 232045.24    (k) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 25utilize combined heat and power or cogeneration technology 26shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to   SB2718- 9 -LRB104 15725 AAS 28908 b1zero, including through unit retirement or the use of 100% 2green hydrogen or other similar technology that is 3commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by 4January 1, 2060 2045.5    (k-5) No EGU or large greenhouse gas-emitting unit that 6uses gas as a fuel and is not a public GHG-emitting unit may 7emit, in any 12-month period, CO2e or copollutants in excess of 8that unit's existing emissions for those pollutants. 9    (l) Notwithstanding subsections (g) through (k-5), large 10GHG-emitting units including EGUs may temporarily continue 11emitting CO2e and copollutants after any applicable deadline 12specified in any of subsections (g) through (k-5) if it has 13been determined, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of 14this subsection, that ongoing operation of the EGU is 15necessary to maintain power grid supply and reliability or 16ongoing operation of large GHG-emitting unit that is not an 17EGU is necessary to serve as an emergency backup to 18operations. Up to and including the occurrence of an emission 19reduction deadline under subsection (i), all EGUs and large 20GHG-emitting units must comply with the following terms:21        (1) if an EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 22    participant in a regional transmission organization 23    intends to retire, it must submit documentation to the 24    appropriate regional transmission organization by the 25    appropriate deadline that meets all applicable regulatory 26    requirements necessary to obtain approval to permanently   SB2718- 10 -LRB104 15725 AAS 28908 b1    cease operating the large GHG-emitting unit;2        (2) if any EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 3    participant in a regional transmission organization 4    receives notice that the regional transmission 5    organization has determined that continued operation of 6    the unit is required, the unit may continue operating 7    until the issue identified by the regional transmission 8    organization is resolved. The owner or operator of the 9    unit must cooperate with the regional transmission 10    organization in resolving the issue and must reduce its 11    emissions to zero, consistent with the requirements under 12    subsection (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as 13    applicable, as soon as practicable when the issue 14    identified by the regional transmission organization is 15    resolved; and16        (3) any large GHG-emitting unit that is not a 17    participant in a regional transmission organization shall 18    be allowed to continue emitting CO2e and copollutants 19    after the zero-emission date specified in subsection (g), 20    (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as applicable, in the 21    capacity of an emergency backup unit if approved by the 22    Illinois Commerce Commission.23    (m) No variance, adjusted standard, or other regulatory 24relief otherwise available in this Act may be granted to the 25emissions reduction and elimination obligations in this 26Section.  SB2718- 11 -LRB104 15725 AAS 28908 b1    (n) By June 30 of each year, beginning in 2025, the Agency 2shall prepare and publish on its website a report setting 3forth the actual greenhouse gas emissions from individual 4units and the aggregate statewide emissions from all units for 5the prior year.6    (o) Every 5 years beginning in 2025, the Environmental 7Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 8Commerce Commission shall jointly prepare, and release 9publicly, a report to the General Assembly that examines the 10State's current progress toward its renewable energy resource 11development goals, the status of CO2e and copollutant 12emissions reductions, the current status and progress toward 13developing and implementing green hydrogen technologies, the 14current and projected status of electric resource adequacy and 15reliability throughout the State for the period beginning 5 16years ahead, and proposed solutions for any findings. The 17Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and 18Illinois Commerce Commission shall consult PJM 19Interconnection, LLC and Midcontinent Independent System 20Operator, Inc., or their respective successor organizations 21regarding forecasted resource adequacy and reliability needs, 22anticipated new generation interconnection, new transmission 23development or upgrades, and any announced large GHG-emitting 24unit closure dates and include this information in the report. 25The report shall be released publicly by no later than 26December 15 of the year it is prepared. If the Environmental   SB2718- 12 -LRB104 15725 AAS 28908 b1Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 2Commerce Commission jointly conclude in the report that the 3data from the regional grid operators, the pace of renewable 4energy development, the pace of development of energy storage 5and demand response utilization, transmission capacity, and 6the CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions required by 7subsection (i) or (k-5) reasonably demonstrate that a resource 8adequacy shortfall will occur, including whether there will be 9sufficient in-state capacity to meet the zonal requirements of 10MISO Zone 4 or the PJM ComEd Zone, per the requirements of the 11regional transmission organizations, or that the regional 12transmission operators determine that a reliability violation 13will occur during the time frame the study is evaluating, then 14the Illinois Power Agency, in conjunction with the 15Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a plan to reduce 16or delay CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions 17requirements only to the extent and for the duration necessary 18to meet the resource adequacy and reliability needs of the 19State, including allowing any plants whose emission reduction 20deadline has been identified in the plan as creating a 21reliability concern to continue operating, including operating 22with reduced emissions or as emergency backup where 23appropriate. The plan shall also consider the use of renewable 24energy, energy storage, demand response, transmission 25development, or other strategies to resolve the identified 26resource adequacy shortfall or reliability violation.  SB2718- 13 -LRB104 15725 AAS 28908 b1        (1) In developing the plan, the Environmental 2    Protection Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall hold 3    at least one workshop open to, and accessible at a time and 4    place convenient to, the public and shall consider any 5    comments made by stakeholders or the public. Upon 6    development of the plan, copies of the plan shall be 7    posted and made publicly available on the Environmental 8    Protection Agency's, the Illinois Power Agency's, and the 9    Illinois Commerce Commission's websites. All interested 10    parties shall have 60 days following the date of posting 11    to provide comment to the Environmental Protection Agency 12    and the Illinois Power Agency on the plan. All comments 13    submitted to the Environmental Protection Agency and the 14    Illinois Power Agency shall be encouraged to be specific, 15    supported by data or other detailed analyses, and, if 16    objecting to all or a portion of the plan, accompanied by 17    specific alternative wording or proposals. All comments 18    shall be posted on the Environmental Protection Agency's, 19    the Illinois Power Agency's, and the Illinois Commerce 20    Commission's websites. Within 30 days following the end of 21    the 60-day review period, the Environmental Protection 22    Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall revise the plan 23    as necessary based on the comments received and file its 24    revised plan with the Illinois Commerce Commission for 25    approval.26        (2) Within 60 days after the filing of the revised   SB2718- 14 -LRB104 15725 AAS 28908 b1    plan at the Illinois Commerce Commission, any person 2    objecting to the plan shall file an objection with the 3    Illinois Commerce Commission. Within 30 days after the 4    expiration of the comment period, the Illinois Commerce 5    Commission shall determine whether an evidentiary hearing 6    is necessary. The Illinois Commerce Commission shall also 7    host 3 public hearings within 90 days after the plan is 8    filed. Following the evidentiary and public hearings, the 9    Illinois Commerce Commission shall enter its order 10    approving or approving with modifications the reliability 11    mitigation plan within 180 days.12        (3) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall only 13    approve the plan if the Illinois Commerce Commission 14    determines that it will resolve the resource adequacy or 15    reliability deficiency identified in the reliability 16    mitigation plan at the least amount of CO2e and copollutant 17    emissions, taking into consideration the emissions impacts 18    on environmental justice communities, and that it will 19    ensure adequate, reliable, affordable, efficient, and 20    environmentally sustainable electric service at the lowest 21    total cost over time, taking into account the impact of 22    increases in emissions.23        (4) If the resource adequacy or reliability deficiency 24    identified in the reliability mitigation plan is resolved 25    or reduced, the Environmental Protection Agency and the 26    Illinois Power Agency may file an amended plan adjusting   SB2718- 15 -LRB104 15725 AAS 28908 b1    the reduction or delay in CO2e and copollutant emission 2    reduction requirements identified in the plan. 3(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 102-1031, eff. 5-27-22.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.